Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4626
Authority to release.

A powerholder may release a power of appointment, in whole or in part, except to the extent the terms of the instrument creating the power prevent the release.

Laws 2021, LB501, § 49.